Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB522.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-MCOLLABORATIVE CARE MODELAND PRIMARY CARE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH MODELIMPLEMENTATION PROGRAMSection 101-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Collaborative care model." The evidence-based, integrated behavioral health service delivery method described in 81 Fed. Reg. 220, 80230 (November 15, 2016), which includes a formal collaborative arrangement among a primary care team consisting of a primary care physician, a care manager and a psychiatric consultant, and includes the following elements:(1) Care directed by the primary care team.(2) Structured care management.(3) Regular assessments of clinical status using developmentally appropriate, validated tools.(4) Modification of treatment as appropriate."Collaborative care technical assistance center." A health care organization that can provide educational support and technical assistance related to the collaborative care model or primary care behavioral health model in a specific region of this Commonwealth. The term includes an academic medical center 20250SB0522PN0497 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 located in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Primary care behavioral health model." The evidence-based, integrated behavioral health service delivery method which may include a licensed behavioral health professional, psychologist, psychiatrist, clinical social worker or counselor in the primary care team and the following elements:(1) Care directed by the primary care team.(2) Structured care management.(3) Regular assessments of clinical status using developmentally appropriate, validated tools.(4) Modification of treatment as appropriate.Section 102-M. Primary care grants.(a) Grants.--The department shall make grants to primary care physicians and primary care practices to meet the initial costs of establishing and delivering behavioral health integration services through the collaborative care model or primary care behavioral health model. Primary care physicians and primary care practices may work with larger health systems for the purposes of applying for and implementing grants under this section.(b) Use of grants.--A primary care physician or primary care practice that receives a grant under this section shall use funds received through the grant:(1) To hire staff.(2) To identify and formalize contractual relationships with other health care practitioners, including practitioners who will function as psychiatric consultants and behavioral health care managers in providing behavioral health 20250SB0522PN0497 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 integration services through the collaborative care model or primary care behavioral health model.(3) To purchase or upgrade software and other resources needed to appropriately provide behavioral health integration services through the collaborative care model or primary care behavioral health model, including resources needed to establish a patient registry and implement measurement-based care.(4) For other purposes that the department may determine to be necessary.(c) Priority.--In making grants under this section, the department shall give priority to primary care physicians and primary care practices:(1) that are in rural areas; or(2) that are in a county in which the suicide or overdose death rate is higher than the national average suicide or overdose death rate, according to the averages recorded and maintained by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Section 103-M. Technical assistance grants.(a) Regions.--The department shall divide the Commonwealth into the following six regions:(1) Northeast.(2) Southeast.(3) North central.(4) South central.(5) Northwest.(6) Southwest.(b) Grants.--The department shall solicit proposals from and enter into a grant agreement with at least one eligible 20250SB0522PN0497 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collaborative care technical assistance center applicant from each region under subsection (a) to provide technical assistance to primary care physicians and primary care practices on providing behavioral health integration services through the collaborative care model or primary care behavioral health model.(c) Technical assistance described.--An entity that receives a grant under subsection (b), in a region described in subsection (a), shall provide technical assistance to primary care physicians and primary care practices within that region that will assist primary care physicians and primary care practices with the following:(1) Developing financial models and budgets for program launch and sustainability based on practice size.(2) Developing staffing models for essential staff roles, including care managers, licensed behavioral health professionals, psychologists and consulting psychiatrists.(3) Providing information technology expertise to assist with building the model requirements into electronic health records, including assistance with care manager tools, patient registry, ongoing patient monitoring and patient records.(4) Training support for all key staff and operational consultation to develop practice workflows.(5) Establishing methods to ensure the sharing of best practices and operational knowledge among primary care physicians and primary care practices that provide behavioral health integration services through the collaborative care model or primary care behavioral health model.(6) Accurately and appropriately coding and billing 20250SB0522PN0497 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurers for collaborative care model and primary care behavioral health model services.(7) For other purposes that the department may determine to be necessary.(d) Promotion required.--A collaborative care technical assistance center that receives a grant under subsection (b), in a region described in subsection (a), shall promote to primary care physicians and primary care practices within the collaborative care technical assistance center's region the opportunity for primary care physicians and primary care practices to apply for and receive the grants available under section 102-M.Section 104-M. Eligibility.(a) Eligible applicant.--In order to be deemed an eligible applicant, a collaborative care technical assistance center must provide information on how it would meet the guidelines under section 103-M when submitting an application to the department.(b) Exception.--If there are no applications submitted to the department by a potential collaborative care technical assistance center under section 103-M, in one or more regions described under section 103-M(a), or the department determines that none of the applications for a particular region indicate that any applicant is fully capable of providing the technical assistance described in section 103-M(c), the department may award a grant to an applicant from outside that region if the applicant describes how it will adequately provide the technical assistance in the region.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0522PN0497 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728